California statutes. Public Resources Code
 and it approves or determines to carry out the project, the local agency shall file a notice with the Office of Planning and Research and with the county clerk in each county in which the project will be located in the manner specified in subdivisions (b) and (c) of Section 21152.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 143, Sec. 1.   (SB 348)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

21080.14.

(a) This division does not apply to the closure of a railroad grade crossing by order of the Public Utilities Commission pursuant to Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 1201) of Part 1 of Division 1 of the Public Utilities Code, if the Public Utilities Commission finds the crossing to present a threat to public safety.

(b) This section does not apply to any crossing for high-speed rail, as defined in Section 185012 of the Public Utilities Code, or any crossing for a project carried out by the High-Speed Rail Authority, as described in Section 185020 of the Public Utilities Code, or a successor agency.

(c) (1) Whenever a state agency determines that a project
 is not subject to this division pursuant to this section, and it approves or determines to carry out the project, the state agency shall file a notice with the Office of Land Use and Climate Innovation in the manner specified in subdivisions (b), (c), and (d) of Section 21108.

(2) Whenever a local agency determines that a project is not subject to this division pursuant to this section, and it approves or determines to carry out the project, the local agency shall file a notice with the State Clearinghouse in the Office of Land Use and Climate Innovation and with the county clerk in each county in which the project will be located in the manner specified in subdivisions (b), (c), and (d) of Section 21152.

(History: Added by Stats. 2026, Ch. 151, Sec. 1.   (SB 1008)   Effective August 27, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

21080.17.

This division does not apply to the adoption of an ordinance by a city or county to implement Section 65852.1 of, or Article 2 (commencing with Section 66314) or Article 3 (commencing with Section 66333) of Chapter 13 of Division 1 of Title 7 of, the Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 210, Sec. 1.   (AB 3057)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

21080.18.

This division does not apply to the closing of any public school in which kindergarten or any of grades 1 through 12 is maintained or the transfer of students from that public school to another school if the only physical changes involved are categorically exempt under Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 15000) of Division 6 of Title 14 of the California Administrative Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1986, Ch. 1316, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

21080.19.

This division does not apply to a project for restriping of streets or highways to relieve traffic congestion.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 750, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

21080.20.

(a) (1) (A) This division does not apply to an active transportation plan, a pedestrian plan, or a bicycle transportation plan for the restriping of streets and highways, bicycle parking and storage, signal timing to improve street and highway intersection operations, and the related signage for bicycles, pedestrians, and vehicles.

(B) This division does not apply to a transit comprehensive operational analysis, transit route readjustment, or other transit agency route addition, elimination, or modification.

(2) An active transportation plan or pedestrian plan is encouraged to include
 the consideration of environmental factors, but that consideration does not inhibit or preclude the application of this section.

(3) An individual project that is a part of an active transportation plan, pedestrian plan, or transit comprehensive operational analysis remains subject to this division unless another exemption applies to that project.

(b) Before determining that a project described in subdivision (a) is exempt pursuant to this section, the lead agency shall hold noticed public hearings in areas affected by the project to hear and respond to public comments. Publication of the notice shall be no fewer times than required by Section 6061 of the Government Code by the public agency in a newspaper of general circulation in the area affected by the proposed project. If
 more than one area will be affected, the notice shall be published in the newspaper of largest circulation from among the newspapers of general circulation in those areas.

(c) If a local agency determines that a project is not subject to this division pursuant to this section and it determines to approve or carry out that project, the notice shall be filed with the Office of Land Use and Climate Innovation and the county clerk in the county in which the project is located in the manner specified in subdivisions (b) and (c) of Section 21152.

(d) For purposes of this section, the following definitions apply:

(1) “Active transportation plan” means a plan developed by a local jurisdiction that promotes and encourages people to
 choose walking, bicycling, or rolling through the creation of safe, comfortable, connected, and accessible walking, bicycling, or rolling networks, and encourages alternatives to single-occupancy vehicle trips.

(2) “Pedestrian plan” means a plan developed by a local jurisdiction that establishes a comprehensive, coordinated approach to improving pedestrian infrastructure and safety.

(3) “Transit comprehensive operational analysis” means a plan that redesigns or modifies a transit operator’s or local agency’s public transit service network, including the routing of fixed route and microtransit services.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 742, Sec. 1.   (SB 71)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

21080.21.

This division does not apply to any project of less than one mile in length within a public street or highway or any other public right-of-way for the installation of a new pipeline or the maintenance, repair, restoration, reconditioning, relocation, replacement, removal, or demolition of an existing pipeline. For purposes of this section, “pipeline” includes subsurface facilities but does not include any surface facility related to the operation of the underground facility.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 466, Sec. 4.   (AB 1824)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

21080.22.

(a) This division does not apply to activities and approvals by a local government necessary for the preparation of general plan amendments pursuant to Section 29763, except that the approval of general plan amendments by the Delta Protection Commission is subject to the requirements of this division.

(b) For purposes of Section 21080.5, a general plan amendment is a plan required by the regulatory program of the Delta Protection Commission.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 898, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

21080.23.

(a) This division does not apply to any project which consists of the inspection, maintenance, repair, restoration, reconditioning, relocation, replacement, or removal of an existing pipeline, as defined in subdivision (a) of Section 51010.5 of the Government Code, or any valve, flange, meter, or other piece of equipment that is directly attached to the pipeline, if the project meets all of the following conditions:

(1) (A) The project is less than eight miles in length.

(B) Notwithstanding subparagraph (A), actual construction and excavation activities undertaken to
 achieve the maintenance, repair, restoration, reconditioning, relocation, replacement, or removal of an existing pipeline are not undertaken over a length of more than one-half mile at any one time.

(2) The project consists of a section of pipeline that is not less than eight miles from any section of pipeline that has been subject to an exemption pursuant to this section in the past 12 months.

(3) The project is not solely for the purpose of excavating soil that is contaminated by hazardous materials, and, to the extent not otherwise expressly required by law, the party undertaking the project immediately informs the lead agency of the discovery of contaminated soil.

(4) To the extent not otherwise expressly required by
 law, the person undertaking the project has, in advance of undertaking the project, prepared a plan that will result in notification of the appropriate agencies so that they may take action, if determined to be necessary, to provide for the emergency evacuation of members of the public who may be located in close proximity to the project.

(5) Project activities are undertaken within an existing right-of-way and the right-of-way is restored to its condition prior to the project.

(6) The project applicant agrees to comply with all conditions otherwise authorized by law, imposed by the city or county planning department as part of any local agency permit process, that are required to mitigate potential impacts of the proposed project, and to otherwise comply with the
 Keene-Nejedly California Wetlands Preservation Act (Chapter 7 (commencing with Section 5810) of Division 5), the California Endangered Species Act (Chapter 1.5 (commencing with Section 2050) of Division 3 of the Fish and Game Code), and other applicable state laws, and
 with all applicable federal laws.

(b) If a project meets all of the requirements of subdivision (a), the person undertaking the project shall do all of the following:

(1) Notify, in writing, any affected public agency, including, but not limited to, any public agency having permit, land use, environmental, public health protection, or emergency response authority of the exemption of the project from this division by subdivision (a).

(2) Provide notice to the public in the affected area in a manner consistent with paragraph (3) of subdivision (b) of Section 21092.

(3) In the case of private rights-of-way over private property, receive from the
 underlying property owner permission for access to the property.

(4) Comply with all conditions otherwise authorized by law, imposed by the city or county planning department as part of any local agency permit process, that are required to mitigate potential impacts of the proposed project, and otherwise comply with the Keene-Nejedly California Wetlands Preservation Act (Chapter 7 (commencing with Section 5810) of Division 5), the California Endangered Species Act (Chapter 1.5 (commencing with Section 2050) of Division 3 of the Fish and Game Code), and other applicable state laws, and with all applicable federal laws.

(c) This section does not apply to either of the following:

(1) A project in which the diameter of the
 pipeline is increased.

(2) A project undertaken within the boundaries of an oil refinery.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 548, Sec. 3.   (AB 2669)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

21080.24.

This division does not apply to the issuance, modification, amendment, or renewal of a permit by an air pollution control district or air quality management district pursuant to Title V, as defined in Section 39053.3 of the Health and Safety Code, or pursuant to a district Title V program established pursuant to Sections 42301.10, 42301.11, and 42301.12 of the Health and Safety Code, unless the issuance, modification, amendment, or renewal authorizes a physical or operational change to a source or facility.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 548, Sec. 4.   (AB 2669)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

21080.25.

(a) For purposes of this section, the following definitions apply:

(1) “Affordable housing” means any of the following:

(A) Housing that is subject to a recorded covenant, ordinance, or law that restricts rents or sales prices to levels affordable, as defined in Section 50052.5 or 50053 of the Health and Safety Code, to persons and families of moderate, lower, or very low income, as defined in Section 50079.5, 50093, or 50105 of the Health and Safety Code, respectively.

(B) Housing that is subject to any form of rent or price control through a public entity’s
 valid exercise of its police power.

(C) Housing that had been occupied by tenants within five years from the date of approval of the development agreement by a primary tenant who was low income and did not leave voluntarily.

(2) “Bicycle facilities” includes, but is not limited to, bicycle parking, bicycle sharing facilities, and bikeways as defined in Section 890.4 of the Streets and Highways Code.

(3) “High-occupancy vehicle” means a vehicle with three or more occupants.

(4) “Highway” means a way or place of whatever nature, publicly maintained and open to the use of the public for purposes of vehicular travel. “Highway” includes a street.

(5) “Local agency” means a public transit operator, city, county, city and county, special district, joint powers authority, local or regional transportation agency, or congestion management agency.

(6) “Part-time transit lanes” means designated highway shoulders that support the operation of transit vehicles during specified times and are not open to nonpublic transit vehicles at any time.

(7) “Project labor agreement” has the same meaning as defined in paragraph (1) of subdivision (b) of Section 2500 of the Public Contract Code.

(8) “Public transit operator” has the same meaning as “operator” in Section 99210 of the Public Utilities Code, or means a public entity
 that provides contracted paratransit services.

(9) “Skilled and trained workforce” has the same meaning as provided in Chapter 2.9 (commencing with Section 2600) of Part 1 of Division 2 of the Public Contract Code.

(10) “Transit lanes” means street design elements that delineate space within the roadbed as exclusive to transit use, either full or part time.

(11) “Transit prioritization projects” means any of the following transit project types on highways or in the public right-of-way:

(A) Signal and sign changes, such as signal coordination, signal timing modifications, signal modifications, or the installation of traffic signs or new signals.

(B) The installation of wayside technology and onboard technology.

(C) The installation of ramp meters.

(D) The conversion to dedicated transit lanes, including transit queue jump or bypass lanes, shared turning lanes and turn restrictions, the narrowing of lanes to allow for dedicated transit lanes or transit reliability improvements, or the widening of existing transit travel lanes by removing or restricting street parking.

(E) Transit stop access and safety improvements, including, but not limited to, the installation of bus shelters, lighting, transit bulbs, and the installation of transit boarding landings and islands.

(12) “Transportation demand management program” means a specific program of strategies, incentives, and tools to be implemented, including, with specified annual status reporting obligations, to reduce vehicle trips by providing opportunities for the public to choose sustainable travel options, such as transit, bicycle riding, or walking. A specific program of strategies, incentives, and tools includes, but is not limited to, any of the following:

(A) Provision of onsite electric vehicle charging stations in excess of applicable requirements.

(B) Provision of dedicated parking for car share or zero-emission vehicles, or both types of vehicles, in excess of applicable requirements.

(C) Provision of bicycle parking in excess of applicable requirements.

(b) This division does not apply to any of the following projects:

(1) Pedestrian and bicycle facilities that improve safety, access, or mobility, including new facilities, within the public right-of-way.

(2) Projects that improve customer information and wayfinding for transit riders, bicyclists, or pedestrians within the public right-of-way.

(3) Transit prioritization projects.

(4) A project for the designation and conversion of general purpose lanes to high-occupancy vehicle lanes or bus-only lanes, or highway
 shoulders to part-time transit lanes, for use either during peak congestion hours or all day on highways with existing public transit service or where a public transit agency will be implementing public transit service as identified in a short-range transit plan.

(5) (A) A public project for the protection, improvement, institution, or increase of microtransit, paratransit, shuttle, bus, ferry, bus rapid transit, or light rail service, including the protection, maintenance, construction, operation, or rehabilitation of stops, stations, terminals, or existing operations facilities, which will be exclusively used by zero-emission, near-zero-emission, low oxide of nitrogen engine, compressed natural gas fuel, fuel cell, or hybrid powertrain vehicles, rail or cable cars, rolling stock, or vessels. The project shall be
 located entirely within an existing public right-of-way or existing highway right-of-way, whether or not the right-of-way is in use for rail or public mass transit and is wholly within the boundaries of an urbanized area or urban cluster, as designated by the United States Census Bureau.

(B) A public project otherwise identified in subparagraph (A) shall not apply to the exemption pursuant to this paragraph after January 1, 2032, if used primarily by near-zero-emission, low oxide of nitrogen engine, compressed natural gas fuel, or hybrid powertrain vehicles. This subparagraph shall not apply to a public project otherwise identified in subparagraph (A) used by articulated buses.

(C) A public project for the construction or rehabilitation of a ferry terminal that a lead agency has
 submitted a notice of preparation for an environmental impact report pursuant to Section 21092 before January 1, 2026, shall not apply to the exemption pursuant to this paragraph.

(D) A public project for transit services operated by a transportation network company, as defined in Section 5431 of the Public Utilities Code, shall not apply to the exemption pursuant to this paragraph, unless the services are operated by a microtransit provider contracted by the lead agency that uses a managed fleet of multipassenger vehicles dedicated to that service.

(6) (A) A public project for the improvement, institution, or increase of passenger rail service, other than light rail service eligible under paragraph (5), including the maintenance, construction, or
 rehabilitation of stations, terminals, or existing operations facilities, which will be exclusively used by zero-emission trains or certified Tier 4 or cleaner rolling stock or locomotives, as provided in Section 1033.101 of Title 40 of the Code of Federal Regulations. The project shall be located entirely within an existing rail right-of-way or existing highway right-of-way, whether or not the right-of-way is in use for passenger rail transit.

(B) A public project otherwise identified in subparagraph (A)
 shall not be eligible for the exemption pursuant to this paragraph if used by certified Tier 4 or cleaner rolling stock or locomotives that are not zero-emission rolling stock or locomotives and the project is located in an air basin designated as a serious, severe, or extreme nonattainment area for particulate matter and ozone.

(7) (A) A public project to construct or maintain infrastructure or facilities to charge, refuel, power, or maintain zero-emission public transit buses, trains, or ferries, provided the project is carried out by a public transit agency and the project is any of the following:

(i) Located on property owned, leased, or operated by the local agency.

(ii) Located within an existing public right-of-way.

(iii) Located on property owned by a public or private utility within an urbanized area.

(B) A lead agency applying an exemption pursuant to this paragraph for hydrogen refueling infrastructure or facilities necessary to refuel or maintain zero-emission public transit buses, trains, or ferries shall comply with clauses (i), (iii), and (iv) of subparagraph (D) of, and with subparagraph (E) of, paragraph (1) of subdivision (d).

(8) The maintenance, repair, relocation, replacement, or removal of any utility infrastructure associated with a project identified in paragraphs (1) to (7), inclusive.

(9) A project that consists exclusively of a combination of any of the components of a project identified in paragraphs (1) to (8), inclusive.

(10) (A) A project that combines a project identified in paragraphs (1) to (8), inclusive, and a housing development project that is either subject to a nondiscretionary approval or is exempt from this division.

(B) This paragraph does not exempt the housing development project described in subparagraph (A) from any other applicable requirements under any other law.

(11) A planning decision carried out by a local agency to reduce or eliminate minimum parking requirements or institute parking maximums, remove or restrict parking, or implement transportation demand management requirements or programs.

(c) Except as provided in subdivision (g), a project exempt from this division under this section shall meet all of the following criteria:

(1) (A) A local agency is carrying out the project and is the lead agency for the project.

(B) The lead agency shall take an action to approve a project as follows:

(i) The lead agency’s governing board shall take an action at a public meeting.

(ii) Notwithstanding clause (i), if a lead agency has an alternative project approval process for a project subject to subdivision (b), it may instead follow that alternative process.

(2) The project does not induce single-occupancy vehicle trips, add additional highway lanes, widen highways, or add physical infrastructure or striping to highways except for minor modifications needed for the efficient and safe movement of transit vehicles, bicycles, or high-occupancy vehicles, such as extended merging lanes, shoulder improvements, or improvements to the roadway within the existing right-of-way. The project shall not include the addition of
 any auxiliary lanes.

(3) The construction of the project shall not require the demolition of affordable housing units.

(d) (1) A project that is exempt from this division under this section that is, based on the project engineer’s cost estimate at the time the local agency takes an action pursuant to subparagraph (B) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (c), anticipated to exceed one hundred million dollars ($100,000,000) shall also meet all of the following criteria:

(A) The project is incorporated in a regional transportation plan, sustainable communities strategy, general plan, or other plan that has undergone a programmatic-level environmental review pursuant to this division within 10 years of the
 approval of the project.

(B) The project’s construction impacts are fully mitigated consistent with applicable law.

(C) (i) The lead agency shall complete and consider the results of a project business case and a racial equity analysis. The Office of Land Use and Climate Innovation may set guidelines for the project business case and the racial equity analysis or delegate that authority to metropolitan planning organizations.

(ii) The racial equity analysis required under this subparagraph shall identify the racial equity impacts of the project, identify who will benefit from and be burdened by the project, and, where significant or disproportionate impacts exist, suggest strategies, designs,
 or actions to mitigate those impacts.

(D) The lead agency shall hold noticed public meetings as follows:

(i) Before determining that a project is exempt pursuant to this section, the lead agency shall hold at least three noticed public meetings in the project area to hear and respond to public comments.

(ii) At least one of the three public meetings shall review the project business case and the racial equity analysis. The review of these documents does not inhibit or preclude application of this section.

(iii) The lead agency shall conduct at least two noticed public meetings annually during project construction for the public to provide comments.

(iv) The public meetings held pursuant to clauses (i) to (iii), inclusive, shall be in the form of either a public community planning meeting held in the project area or in the form of a regularly scheduled meeting of the governing body of the lead agency.

(E) The lead agency shall give public notice of the meetings in subparagraph (D) to the last known name and address of all the organizations and individuals that have previously requested notice and shall also give the general public notice using at least one of the following procedures:

(i) Publication of the notice in a newspaper of general circulation in the area affected by the project. If more than one area will be affected, the notice shall be published in the
 newspaper of largest circulation from among the newspapers of general circulation in those areas.

(ii) Posting of the notice onsite and offsite in the area where the project is located.

(iii) Posting of the notice on the lead agency’s internet website and social media accounts.

(2) In addition to the requirements of paragraph (1), for a project described in that paragraph for which at least 50 percent of the project or project’s stops and stations are located in an area that is at risk of residential displacement and that will have a maximum of 15-minute peak headways, the local agency shall complete an analysis of residential displacement and suggest antidisplacement strategies, designs, or actions. For a
 project subject to this paragraph, the lead agency shall define or identify areas at risk of residential displacement.

(3) The amount in paragraph (1) shall be adjusted pursuant to subdivision (j).

(e) (1) A project that is exempt from this division under this section that is, based on the project engineer’s cost estimate at the time the local agency takes an action pursuant to subparagraph (B) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (c), anticipated to exceed fifty million dollars ($50,000,000) shall also comply with clauses (i), (iii), and (iv) of subparagraph (D) of, and with subparagraph (E) of, paragraph (1) of subdivision (d).

(2) The amount in paragraph (1) shall be adjusted pursuant to subdivision
 (j).

(f) (1) (A) Except as provided in subdivision (g), as part of the lead agency’s governing board action pursuant to subparagraph (B) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (c), the lead agency shall certify that the project will be completed by a skilled and trained workforce.

(B) Subparagraph (A) does not apply if the lead agency has an existing policy or certification approved by its governing board that requires the use of a skilled and trained workforce to complete the project if the lead agency is a signatory to a project labor agreement that will require the use of a skilled and trained workforce on the project.

(2) (A) Except as provided in subparagraph
 (B), for a project that is exempted under this section, the lead agency shall not enter into a construction contract with any entity unless the entity provides to the lead agency an enforceable commitment that the entity and its subcontractors at every tier will use a skilled and trained workforce to perform all work on the project or a contract that falls within an apprenticeship occupation in the building and construction trades in accordance with Chapter 2.9 (commencing with Section 2600) of Part 1 of Division 2 of the Public Contract Code.

(B) Subparagraph (A) does not apply if any of the following requirements are met:

(i) The lead agency has entered into a project labor agreement that will bind all contractors and subcontractors performing work on the project
 to use a skilled and trained workforce and the entity has agreed to be bound by that project labor agreement.

(ii) The project or contract is being performed under the extension or renewal of a project labor agreement that was entered into by the lead agency before January 1, 2021.

(iii) The entity contracted to perform the project entered into a project labor agreement that will bind the entity and all its subcontractors at every tier performing the project to use a skilled and trained workforce.

(g) Subdivisions (c) and (f) do not apply to a project described in paragraph
 (11) of subdivision (b).

(h) If the lead agency determines that a project is not subject to this division pursuant to this section, and the lead agency determines to carry out that project, the lead agency shall file a notice of exemption with the Office of Land Use and Climate Innovation and the county clerk of the county in which the project is located in the manner specified in subdivisions (b) and (c) of Section 21152.

(i) (1) The amendments made to paragraph (5) of subdivision (b) by Chapter 987 of the Statutes of 2022 (Senate Bill 922 of the 2021–22 Regular Session) may apply to projects for which a lead agency has filed a notice of exemption under this section before January 1, 2023.

(2) For projects for which a lead agency has filed a notice of exemption under this section before January 1, 2023, notwithstanding subdivision (d), as it read on December 31, 2022, the lead agency may certify that the project will be completed by
 a skilled and trained workforce after the granting of the exemption under this section or the lead agency may demonstrate compliance with subparagraph (B) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (f).

(j) (1) Beginning January 1, 2026, and every two years thereafter, the Office of Land Use and Climate Innovation shall adjust the amounts reflected in paragraph (1) of subdivision (c) and paragraph (1) of subdivision (e) to reflect changes in the Consumer Price Index, as indicated in the Consumer Price Index for All Urban Consumers, as calculated by the Department of Finance based on the United States Bureau of Labor Statistics data for the most recent odd-numbered year, and publish the updated amounts on its internet website.

(2) Notwithstanding the
 rulemaking provisions of the Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code), the Office of Land Use and Climate Innovation may implement, interpret, or make specific this subdivision without taking any regulatory action.

(k) This section shall remain in effect only until January 1, 2040, and as of that date is repealed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 742, Sec. 2.   (SB 71)   Effective January 1, 2026.   Repealed as of January 1, 2040, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

21080.26.

This division does not apply to minor alterations to utilities made for the purposes of complying with Sections 116410 and 116415 of the Health and Safety Code or regulations adopted thereunder.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 327, Sec. 32.   (AB 1438)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

21080.27.

(a) For purposes of this section, the following definitions apply:

(1) “Affordable cost” has the same meaning as “affordable housing cost” as defined in Section 50052.5 of the Health and Safety Code.

(2) “Affordable housing” means a housing development project that meets all of the following:

(A) A project with 100 percent of all units in the development, exclusive of a manager’s unit or units, dedicated to lower income households, as described in Section
 50052.5 of the Health and Safety Code, at an affordable cost or an affordable rent, except that up to 20 percent of the units in the development may be dedicated to moderate-income households, as defined in Section 50053 of the Health and Safety Code, at an affordable cost or an affordable rent.

(B) The units are subject to a recorded deed restriction for affordable rent for a period of 55 years for rental units and for affordable cost for a period of 45 years for owner-occupied units.

(C) The project is funded, in whole or in part, by any of the following:

(i) The No Place Like Home Program pursuant to Part 3.9 (commencing with Section 5849.1) of Division 5 of the Welfare and Institutions Code.

(ii) The Building Homes and Jobs Trust Fund established pursuant to Section 50470 of the Health and Safety Code.

(iii) Measure H sales tax proceeds approved by the voters at the March 7, 2017, special election in the County of Los Angeles.

(iv) General obligation bonds issued pursuant to Proposition HHH
 approved by the voters of the City of Los Angeles at the November 8, 2016, statewide general election.

(v) The City of Los Angeles Housing Impact Trust Fund.

(vi) The program referred to as Homekey, as described in
 Section 50675.1.1 of the Health and Safety Code.

(vii) The Veterans Housing and Homeless Prevention Act of 2014 established pursuant to Article 3.2 (commencing with Section 987.001) of Chapter 6 of Division 4 of the Military and Veterans Code.

(viii) The Multifamily Housing Program established pursuant to Chapter 6.7 (commencing with Section 50675) of Part 2 of Division 31 of the Health and Safety Code.

(ix) The Infill Infrastructure Grant Program of 2019 established pursuant to Part 12.5 (commencing with Section 53559) of Division 31 of the Health and Safety Code.

(x) The California Housing Accelerator program established pursuant to
 Chapter 6.6 (commencing with Section 50672) of Part 2 of Division 31 of the Health and Safety Code.

(xi) The Affordable Housing and Sustainable Communities Program established pursuant to Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 75210) of Part 1 of Division 44.

(xii) The City of Los Angeles House LA Fund approved by the voters of the City of Los Angeles at the November 8, 2022, statewide general election.

(xiii) Funding distributed by the Los Angeles County Affordable Housing Solutions Agency established pursuant to Title 6.9 (commencing with Section 64700) of the Government Code.

(xiv) Funding distributed by the California Debt Limit Allocation Committee and the
 California Tax Credit Allocation Committee.

(D) The housing development project site meets both of the following conditions:

(i) The site is located in an urbanized area or urban cluster, as designated by the United States Census Bureau.

(ii) If the project is located on a vacant site, the site does not contain tribal cultural resources that could be affected by the development that were found pursuant to a consultation as described by Section 21080.3.1 and the
 effects of which cannot be mitigated pursuant to the process described in Section 21080.3.2.

(E) The housing development project site is not any of the following:

(i) A site located within a very high fire hazard severity zone, as indicated on maps adopted by the Department of Forestry and Fire Protection pursuant to Section 4202 or as designated pursuant to subdivisions (a) and (b) of Section 51179 of the Government Code.

(ii) A site that is either prime farmland or
 farmland of statewide importance, as defined pursuant to United States Department of Agriculture land inventory and monitoring criteria, as modified for California, and designated on the maps prepared by the Farmland Mapping and Monitoring Program of the Department of Conservation, or land zoned or designated for agricultural protection or preservation by a local ballot measure that was approved by the voters of that jurisdiction.

(iii) Wetlands, as defined in the United States Fish and Wildlife Service Manual, Part 660 FW 2 (June 21, 1993).

(iv) A hazardous waste site that is listed pursuant to Section 65962.5 of the Government Code or a hazardous waste site designated by the Department of Toxic Substances Control pursuant to Section 25356 of the Health and Safety Code, unless
 either of the following apply:

(I) The site is an underground storage tank site that received a uniform closure letter issued pursuant to subdivision (g) of Section 25296.10 of the Health and Safety Code based on closure criteria established by the State Water Resources Control Board for residential use or residential mixed uses. This section does not alter or change the conditions to remove a site from the list of hazardous waste sites listed pursuant to Section 65962.5 of the Government Code.

(II) The State Department of Public Health, the State Water Resources Control Board, the Department of Toxic Substances Control, or a local agency making a determination pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 25296.10 of the Health and Safety Code, has otherwise determined that the
 site is suitable for residential use or residential mixed uses.

(v) A site located within a special flood hazard area subject to inundation by the 1 percent annual chance flood (100-year flood) as determined by the Federal Emergency Management Agency in any official maps published by the Federal Emergency Management Agency. If a development proponent is able to satisfy all applicable federal qualifying criteria in order to provide that the site satisfies this clause and is otherwise eligible for an exemption under this section, a local government shall not deny the application on the basis that the development proponent did not comply with any additional permit requirement, standard, or action adopted by that local government that is applicable to that site. A development may be located on a site described in this clause if either of
 the following are met:

(I) The site has been subject to a Letter of Map Revision prepared by the Federal Emergency Management Agency and issued to the local jurisdiction.

(II) The site meets Federal Emergency Management Agency requirements necessary to meet minimum flood plain management criteria of the National Flood Insurance Program pursuant to Part 59 (commencing with Section 59.1) and Part 60 (commencing with Section 60.1) of Subchapter B of Chapter I of Title 44 of the Code of Federal Regulations.

(vi) A site located within a regulatory floodway as determined by the Federal Emergency Management Agency in any official maps published by the Federal Emergency Management Agency, unless the development has
 received a no-rise certification in accordance with Section 60.3(d)(3) of Title 44 of the Code of Federal Regulations. If a development proponent is able to satisfy all applicable federal qualifying criteria in order to provide that the site satisfies this clause and is otherwise eligible for an exemption under this section, a local government shall not deny the application on the basis that the development proponent did not comply with any additional permit requirement, standard, or action adopted by that local government that is applicable to that site.

(vii) Lands identified for conservation in an adopted natural community conservation plan pursuant to the Natural Community Conservation Planning Act (Chapter 10 (commencing with Section 2800) of Division 3 of the Fish and Game Code), habitat conservation plan pursuant to the federal
 Endangered Species Act of 1973 (16 U.S.C. Sec. 1531 et seq.), or other adopted natural resource protection plan.

(viii) Habitat for protected species identified as candidate, sensitive, or species of special status by state or federal agencies, fully protected species, or species protected by the federal Endangered Species Act of 1973 (16 U.S.C. Sec. 1531 et seq.), the California Endangered Species Act (Chapter 1.5 (commencing with Section 2050) of Division 3 of the Fish and Game Code), or the Native Plant Protection Act (Chapter 10 (commencing with Section 1900) of Division 2 of the Fish and Game Code).

(ix) Lands under conservation easement.

(3) “Affordable rent” means a rent amount consistent with the rent